Nebraska, session 109, LB148A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB148A LB148A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $29,629 from the General
Fund and $28,236 from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund for FY2025-26
and (2) $30,921 from the General Fund and $28,236 from the Nebraska State
Patrol Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska State Patrol, for Program
100, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 148, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $33,856
for FY2025-26 or $34,872 for FY2026-27.
-2-